apertium-es-ast.ast.dix
          <pardef n="xixon/és__adj">
            <e>
              <p>
                <l>és</l>
                <r>és<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
              </p>
            </e>
            <e>
              <p>
                <l>esa</l>
                <r>és<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
              </p>
            </e>
            <e>
              <p>
                <l>és</l>
                <r>és<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
              </p>
            </e>
            <e>
              <p>
                <l>eses</l>
                <r>és<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
              </p>
            </e>
          </pardef>
    <pardef n="gran__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e><i>alav</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>alland</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>asturlleon</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>barcelon</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>bearn</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>berlin</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>bual</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>butan</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>cangu</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>cartaxin</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>cingal</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>cordob</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>cornuall</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>cort</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>coruñ</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>cur</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>descort</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>escoc</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>fero</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>fin</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>gran</i><par n="gran__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>grandal</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>groenland</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>hamburgu</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>holand</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>ingl</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>iroqu</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>liban</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>lleon</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>l.luarqu</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>luxemburgu</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>man</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>marsell</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>milan</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>mirand</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>mont</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>neozeland</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>pamplon</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>parragu</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>pedregu</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>pedr</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>pequin</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>piamont</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>piloñ</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>portugu</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>ruand</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>senegal</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>siam</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>sudan</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>tirol</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>ugand</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>vien</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>vigu</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>xixon</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>alav</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>alland</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>asturlleon</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>barcelon</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>bearn</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>berlin</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>bual</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>butan</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>cangu</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>cartaxin</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>cingal</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>cordob</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>cornuall</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>cort</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>coruñ</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>cur</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>descort</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>escoc</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>fero</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>fin</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>grandal</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>groenland</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>hamburgu</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>holand</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>ingl</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>iroqu</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>liban</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>lleon</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>l.luarqu</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>luxemburgu</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>man</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>marsell</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>milan</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>mirand</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>mont</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>neozeland</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>pamplon</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>parragu</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>pedregu</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>pedr</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>pequin</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>piamont</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>piloñ</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>portugu</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>ruand</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>senegal</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>siam</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>sudan</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>tirol</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>ugand</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>vien</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>vigu</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>xixon</i><par n="xixon/és__adj"/></e>
